ko: 지원되는 이미지 형식: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; 기타
pt-PT: Formatos de imagem suportados: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Outro
zh-TW: 支援的圖像格式: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; 其他
zh-CN: 支持的图像格式: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; 其他
sv: Bildformat som stöds: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Övrigt
bg-BG: Поддържани формати на изображения: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Други
th: รองรับรูปแบบภาพ: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; อื่นๆ
it: Formati immagine supportati: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Altro
de: Unterstützte Bildformate: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Sonstiges
pl: Obsługiwane formaty obrazów: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Inne
fi: Tuetut kuvaformaatit: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Muu
hu: Támogatott képformátumok: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Egyéb
nb: Støttede bildeformater: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Annet
hr-HR: Podržani formati slike: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Ostalo
en: Image formats supported: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Other
ru: Поддерживаемые форматы изображений: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Другой
ja: 対応画像フォーマット: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; その他
es: Formatos de imagen compatibles: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Otros
da: Understøttede billedformater: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Andet
vi: Định dạng hình ảnh được hỗ trợ: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Khác
sk-SK: Podporované obrazové formáty: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Iné
pt-BR: Formatos de imagem com suporte: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Outro
fr: Formats d’images pris en charge: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Autre
nl: Ondersteunde afbeeldingsformaten: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Andere
cs: Podporované formáty obrázků: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Jiné
ro-RO: Formate de imagini acceptate: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Altele
sl-SI: Podprte oblike zapisa slik: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Drugo
tr: Desteklenen Resim Formatları: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Diğer
lt-LT: Palaikomi vaizdo formatai: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Kita
el: Υποστηριζόμενες μορφές εικόνας: C-RAW; DNG; EXIF; HEIF; JPEG; JPG; NEF; RAW; TIFF; sRAW; Άλλο